Georgia, session 2025_26, HB170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 3 of Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to authorization and
general requirements for transaction of insurance, is amended by adding a new Code section
to read as follows:
"33-3-28.1.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Benefit provider' means any insurer, health maintenance organization, health benefit
plan, preferred provider organization, employee benefit plan, or other entity which
provides for payment or reimbursement of healthcare expenses, healthcare services,
H. B. 170
- 1 -

LC 52 0621
disability payments, lost wage payments, or any other benefits under a policy of
insurance or contract with an individual or group.
(2) 'Injured party' means a person who alleges that he or she has been injured by the acts
or omissions of a third party and who has received payments or reimbursements from a
benefit provider. Such term also includes the personal representative of the estate of such
person.
(3) 'Treating healthcare provider' means a person duly licensed or legally authorized to
provide healthcare services in this state and who has provided such services to an injured
party.
(b) Within 30 days of a written request from a treating healthcare provider, a benefit
provider shall provide to such treating healthcare provider a written accounting of any and
all payments and reimbursements made to an injured party for such treating healthcare
provider's healthcare services to such injured party."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 170
- 2 -